Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2377.
hereby enacts as follows:THIS ACT MAY BE REFERRED TO AS THE SARAH KATZ CAFFEINE SAFETY LAW.Section 1. Section 5705 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5705. [(Reserved)] Caffeine safety.(a) Disclosure required.--A proprietor of a retail food facility that offers for sale a beverage containing at least 80 250 milligrams of total caffeine per serving, whether as a standard menu item or temporary menu item, shall clearly and conspicuously display a disclosure for the beverage.(b) Contents and placement of disclosure.--The disclosure required under subsection (a) shall:<--<--<--12345678910111213141516 (1) state "high caffeine" or use another similar warning, icon or symbol approved by the department; and(2) appear directly next to the name of the beverage and be clearly associated with the beverage on each menu on which the beverage appears.(c) Enforcement.--If a licensor receives a written complaint or otherwise has reason to believe that a proprietor has violated this section, the licensor shall provide written notice to the proprietor of the alleged violation and order the proprietor to take appropriate corrective action. A proprietor that remains in violation of subsection (a) 30 days after receiving the written notice shall be subject to the penalties under section 5714 (relating to penalties).(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Menu." A posted, written or electronic list or display, including a menu board, that identifies the name and price of a beverage offered for sale by a retail food facility."Temporary menu item." An item that appears on a menu for less than a total of 60 days in a calendar year, whether consecutively or nonconsecutively.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2377PN3674 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223